Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.310

Advertising, sale, trade barrier, claim, etc., provisions in agreement or order.

Any marketing agreement or order may provide for advertising, sales, promotion and/or other programs for maintaining present markets and/or creating new or larger markets for the affected commodity. It may also provide for the prevention, modification or removal of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of the affected commodity to market. Each such order or agreement and all programs thereunder shall be directed toward increasing the sale of such commodity without reference to any particular brand or trade name and shall neither make use of false or unwarranted claims in behalf of such commodity nor disparage the quality, value, sale or use of any other agricultural commodity.

[ 1961 c 256 s 31.]